Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.8744

Technical colleges—Payment to public employees' and retirees' insurance account.

(1) In a manner prescribed by the state health care authority, technical colleges who have employees enrolled in a benefits trust shall remit to the health care authority for deposit in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the amount specified for remittance in the omnibus appropriations act.

(2) The remittance requirements of this section do not apply to employees of a technical college who receive insurance benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.